src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N0_SYNCS !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems with syncopy, soft
:%{SYNCS%}%>ныл SG_ABL_K ;
:%{SYNCS%}%>ыл SG_INS_K ; !
:%{SYNCS%}%>н SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{SYNCS%}%>ын SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{SYNCS%}%>т SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{SYNCS%}%>ыт SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{SYNCS%} SG_NOM_K ;
:%{SYNCS%} SG_TRA_K ;!

:%{SYNCS%} SG_X_PXSG1_ujum ;
:%{SYNCS%}  SG_X_PXSG2_yn ;
:%{SYNCS%}  SG_X_PXSG3_te ;
:%{SYNCS%}  SG_X_PXSG3_tee ;
:%{SYNCS%}  SG_X_PXPL1_ujuv ;
:%{SYNCS%}  SG_X_PXPL3_ajanyl ;
  
:%{SYNCS%} N1_DU ;
:%{SYNCS%} N1_PL ;

:%{SYNCS%} SG_X_PXDU1_ajameen ;
:%{SYNCS%} SG_X_PXDU1_ajamen ;
:%{SYNCS%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{SYNCS%} SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{SYNCS%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;


:%{SYNCS%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmen ;
:%{SYNCS%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCS%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;

:%{SYNCS%}%>ытын PL_LAT_K ;! 
:%{SYNCS%}%>ытыт PL_LOC_K ;! потрытыт 2023_03_11
!:%{SYNCS%}%>ытл PL_INS_K ; ! потрытл 2023_03_11
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanameen ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanamen ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXPL1_ynuv ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;

!:%{SYNCS%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_te ;
!:%{SYNCS%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_te ;
!:%{SYNCS%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_tee ;
!:%{SYNCS%} N1_SG_X_PXDU_LONG ;
!:%{SYNCS%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumeen ;
!:%{SYNCS%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC_PXDU1_ujumen ;
!:%{SYNCS%}	SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
!:%{SYNCS%}	SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{SYNCS%} SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
:%{SYNCS%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;

:%{SYNCS%} SG_X_PXPL2_yn ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:%{SYNCS%}%>ы̄н K ;

:%{SYNCS%} DU_X_PXSG1_ajagum ;
:%{SYNCS%} DU_X_PXSG2_ajagyn ;
:%{SYNCS%} DU_NOM_PXSG2_ajagn ;!check
:%{SYNCS%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{SYNCS%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;

!:%{SYNCS%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
!:%{SYNCS%}	DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;
:%{SYNCS%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCS%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
:%{SYNCS%}	DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{SYNCS%}	DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
:%{SYNCS%} DU_X_PXPL1_ajaguv ;

:%{SYNCS%}  DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCS%}  DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;

:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXSG1_ajanum ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXSG2_ajanyn ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXSG2_ajan ;
!:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanmeen ;
!:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanmen ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
!:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
!:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;

:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{SYNCS%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;


LEXICON N_NOSYNCH !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems without syncopy, hard
: N_VCH ;

LEXICON N_NOSYNCS !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems without syncopy, soft
: N_VCS ;

LEXICON N_VCH_rus100 !!≈ * @CODE@
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_VCH ;
LEXICON N_VCH 
!! put derivations here
+Der+Der/Yng+A:%>ыӈ A0_VCH ;
 N0_VCH ;
LEXICON N0_VCH !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems ending in single hard consonant
:%{VCH%}%>ныл SG_ABL_K ;
:%{VCH%}%>ыл SG_INS_K ; !
:%{VCH%}%>н SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{VCH%}%>т SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{VCH%} SG_NOM_K ;
:%{VCH%} SG_TRA_K ;!
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXSG1_ujum ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXSG2_yn ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXSG3_te ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXSG3_tee ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXPL1_ujuv ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXPL3_ajanyl ;
:%{VCH%} N1_DU ;
:%{VCH%} N1_PL ;

:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yn ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;

:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmeen ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;

:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanameen ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanamen ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VCH%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_e ;
:%{VCH%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_e ;
:%{VCH%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_ee ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_meen ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_men ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;

LEXICON N_XUM !!≈ * @CODE@ Special stems
:%{VCH%}%>ныл SG_ABL_K ;
:%{VCH%}%>ыл SG_INS_K ; !
:%{VCH%}%>н SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{VCH%}%>т SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{VCH%} SG_NOM_K ;
:%{VCH%} SG_TRA_K ;!
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXSG1_ujum ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXSG2_yn ;
:и SG_X_PXSG3_te ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXSG3_tee ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXPL1_ujuv ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXPL3_ajanyl ;
:%{VCH%} N1_DU ;
+Du+Nom+PxSg3:иягэ K ; !MORE Work 2024-04-07
:%{VCH%} SG_TRA_K ;
:ииг DU_NOM_K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:итэ K ;
+Sg+Lat+PxSg3:ытэ̄н K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxDu3:ытэ̄н K ;
+Du+Nom+PxSg3:ияге K ;
:%{VCH%} N1_PL ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg3:иянэ̄ныл K ;
+Pl+Ins+PxDu3:иянэ̄ныл K ;
+Pl+Ins+PxSg2:ияныл K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:ияныл K ;
+Pl+Ins+PxSg2:ия̄ныл K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:ия̄ныл K ;
:ытын PL_LAT_K ;
+Pl+Lat+PxSg3+Err/Orth:ияне̄н K ;
+Pl+Lat+PxSg3:иянэ̄н K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Err/Orth:ияне̄н K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu3:иянэ̄н K ;
+Pl+Lat+PxSg2:иянын K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu2:иянын K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:иянын K ;
+Pl+Lat+PxSg3:иянэн K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxDu3:иянэн K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:иянум K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:иянэ K ;

:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yn ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;

:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmeen ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;

:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanameen ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanamen ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{VCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VCH%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_e ;
:%{VCH%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_e ;
:%{VCH%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_ee ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_meen ;
:%{VCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_men ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{VCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;

LEXICON N_VCCH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_VCCH ;
LEXICON N_VCCH 
!! put derivations here
+Der+Der/Yng+A:%>ыӈ A0_VCH ;
 N0_VCCH ;
LEXICON N0_VCCH !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems ending in hard consonant cluster: а̄вгуст
:%{VCCH%}%>ныл SG_ABL_K ;
:%{VCCH%}%>ыл SG_INS_K ; !
:%{VCCH%}%>ын SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{VCCH%}%>ыт SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{VCCH%} SG_NOM_K ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_TRA_K ;!

:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXSG1_ujum ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXSG2_yn ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXSG3_te ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXSG3_tee ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXPL1_ujuv ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXPL3_ajanyl ;
:%{VCCH%} N1_DU ;
:%{VCCH%} N1_PL ;

:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yn ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;

:%{VCCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmeen ;
:%{VCCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VCCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
:%{VCCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{VCCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
:%{VCCH%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VCCH%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;

:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanameen ;
:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanamen ;
:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{VCCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;

:%{VCCH%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_e ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_e ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_ee ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_meen ;
:%{VCCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_men ;
:%{VCCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{VCCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;

LEXICON N_VCS_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_VCS ;
LEXICON N_VCS
!! put derivations here
 N0_VCS ;
