src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
август+v1+N:август N_VCCH_rus100 ; 
автомеханик+N:автомеханик N_VCH_rus100 ;
а̄гирищ+N:а̄гирищ N_NOSYNCS "девочка" ; !!≈ * @CODE@ CHECKME
адмирал+N:адмирал N_VCH_rus100 "адмирал" ;
аист+N:аист N_VCCH_rus100 "аист" ;
аквапарк+N:аквапарк N_VCCH_rus100 "аквапарк" ;
актор+N:актор N_VCH_rus100 ;
альбом+N:альбом N_VCH_rus100 "альбом" ;
арест+N:арест N_VCCH_rus100 "арест" ;
артель+N:артель N_VCS_rus100 "артель" ;
артист+N:артист N_VCCH_rus100 "артист" ;
археолог+N:археолог N_VCH_rus100 ;
асбест+N:асбест N_VCCH_rus100 ;
аттестат+N:аттестат N_VCH_rus100 "аттестат" ;
аэропорт+N:аэропорт N_VCCH_rus100  "аэропорт" ;
багаж+N:багаж N_VCS_rus100 "багаж" ;
балетмейстер+N:балет#мейстер N_VCH_rus100 ;
бандит+N:бандит N_VCH_rus100 "бандит" ;
банк+N:банк N_VCCH_rus100 "банк" ;
бассейн+N:бассейн N_VCCH_rus100 "бассейн /водоём/" ;
башкир+N:башкир N_VCH_rus100 ;
баянист+N:баянист N_VCCH_rus100 ;
библиотекарь+N:библиотекарь N_VCS_rus100 "библиотекарь" ;
бинт+N:бинт N_VCCH_rus100 "бинт" ;
блин+N:блин N_VCH_rus100 "блин" ;
богатырь+N:богатырь N_VCS_rus100 "богатырь" ;
бой+N:бой N_VCS_rus100 "бой" ;
борщ+N:борщ N_VCS_rus100 "борщ" ;
брак+N:брак N_VCH_rus100 "брак /испорченная продукция/" ;
буддизм+N:буддизм N_VCCH_rus100 ;
букварь+N:букварь N_VCS_rus100 "букварь" ;
бульон+N:бульон N_VCH_rus100 ;
бунт+N:бунт N_VCCH_rus100 "бунт" ;
ва̄тахум+N:ва̄та#хум N_NOSYNCH "купец" ;
вельбот+N:вельбот N_VCH_rus100 "вельбот" ;
вильт+v1+N:вильт N_VCCH "лицо" ;
вильтъят+v1+N:вильтъ#ят N_VCH "лоб" ;
войкануй+N:войкануй N_VCS "червь" ;
госпиталь+N:госпиталь N_VCS "госпиталь" ;
гражданин+N:гражданин N_VCH "гражданин" ;
диалект+N:диалект N_VCCH ;
ё̄ӈхуп+N:ё̄ӈхуп N_NOSYNCH "месяц /период времени/" ;
заказник+N:заказник N_VCH ;
инструмент+N:инструмент N_VCCH "инструмент" ;
йогурт+N:йогурт N_VCCH_rus100 ;  
кабинет-музей+N:кабинет-музей N_VCS_rus100 ;
ка̄лащ+N:ка̄лащ N_VCS "калач" ;
канат+N:канат N_VCH "канат" ;
ке̄лпта̄рс+N:ке̄лп#та̄рс N_VCCH "жила" ;
кисуп+N:кисуп N_NOSYNCH "рябчик" ;
колас+N:колас N_VCH "мука" ;
колка̄пай+N:кол#ка̄пай N_VCS "дом /огромный/" ;
колрищ+N:колрищ N_NOSYNCS "лачуга" ;
колхоз+N:колхоз N_VCH_rus100 "колхоз" ;
консультант+N:консультант N_VCCH ;
край+N:край N_VCS_rus100 "край" ;
кӯтюв+v1+N:кӯтюв N_VCH "собака" ;
кӯтюврищ+N:кӯтюврищ N_NOSYNCS "щенок" ;
лё̄муй+N:лё̄муй N_VCS "комар" ;
лунт+v2+N:лӯнт N_VCCH "гусь" ;
лю̄лит+v1+N:лю̄лит N_VCH "высота" ;
ма̄-во̄й+v3+N:ма̄во̄й N_VCS "petroleum" ;
ма̄ва̄руп+N:ма̄ва̄руп N_NOSYNCH "овод" ;
ма̄таприщ+v3+N:ма̄та̄прищ N_NOSYNCS "мышка//мышь" ;
ма̄таприщ+v2+N:матаприщ N_NOSYNCS "мышь" ;
металл+N:металл N_VCCH "металл" ;
ме̄тхум+N:ме̄т#хум N_NOSYNCH "слуга" ;
мис+N:мис N_VCH "корова" ;
миспыгрищ+N:миспыгрищ N_VCS ;
морковь+N:морковь N_VCS_rus100 ;
невест+N:невест N_VCCH ;
ня̄лтуп+N:ня̄лтуп N_NOSYNCH "крохаль /утка/" ;
ня̄рпум+v3+N:ня̄рт#пум N_NOSYNCH "зелень" ;
ня̄руй+N:ня̄руй N_VCS "червь" ;
о̄парищ+v1+N:о̄парищ N_NOSYNCS "дед" ;
осот+N:осот N_VCH "осот" ;
очередь+N:очередь N_VCS_rus100  "очередь" ;
парашютист+N:парашютист N_VCCH "парашютист" ;
парламент+N:парламент N_VCCH_rus100 ;
печать+N:печать N_VCS "печать /предмет/" ;
пищ-пищ+N:пищ-пищ N_NOSYNCS "мышь" ;
пищ+N:пищ N_NOSYNCS "смысл" ;
по̄льщаӈщирищ+N:по̄льщаӈщирищ N_NOSYNCS "снегирь" ;
портной+N:портной N_VCS "портной" ;
поручение-нэ̄пак+N:поручение-#нэ̄пак N_VCH ;
пост+N:пост N_VCCH "пост" ;
президиум+N:президиум N_NOSYNCH "президиум" ;
пуӈкхум+N:пуӈкхум N_NOSYNCH "глава /руководитель/" ;
режиссёр-сценарист+N:режиссёр-сценарист N_VCCH ;
ринг+N:ринг N_VCH_rus100 ;
рохсуй+v1+N:рохсуй N_VCS "крик" ;
рудник+N:рудник N_VCH "рудник" ;
саюмпум+N:саюм#пум N_NOSYNCH "лук /растение/" ;
сержант+N:сержант N_VCCH "сержант" ;
слесарь+N:слесарь N_VCS "слесарь" ;
стахановец+N:стахановец N_VCH "стахановец" ;
сыг+v1+N:сыг N_NOSYNCH "налим" ;
сыр+N:сыр N_NOSYNCH "сыр" ;
талант+N:талант N_VCCH "талант" ;
техникум+N:техникум N_NOSYNCH "техникум" ;
товарищ+N:товарищ N_NOSYNCS "товарищ" ;
торвиньт+N:торвиньт N_VCCH "храп" ;
тумран+N:тумран N_VCH "варган" ;
тыстыл-во̄щлыл+N:тыстыл-во̄щлыл N_NOSYNCH "горе" ;
ӯйрищ+N:ӯйрищ N_NOSYNCS "птичка" ;
ӯрай+N:ӯрай N_VCS "старица" ;
фонд+N:фонд N_VCCH ;
хаснэхум+N:хаснэ#хум N_XUM "секретарь" ;
хрусталь+N:хрусталь N_VCS_rus100 "хрусталь" ;
хулиган+N:хулиган N_VCH ;
хум+N:хум N_XUM "мужик" ;
ме̄тхум+N:ме̄т#хум N_XUM ;
хо̄нтхум+N:хо̄нт#хум N_XUM ;
тотнэхум+N:тотнэ#хум N_XUM ;
цемент+N:цемент N_VCCH "цемент" ;
щисьной+N:щисьной N_VCS ;
що̄ссуп+N:що̄ссуп N_NOSYNCH ;
юртпы̄грищ+N:юрт#пы̄грищ N_NOSYNCS "друг" ;
ю̄хил+N:ю̄хил N_VCH "большая нужда" ;
якорь+N:якорь N_VCS_rus100 "якорь" ;
январь+N:январь N_VCS_rus100 "январь" ;
